Maryland, session 2025, HB0509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Maryland Inventory of Cemeteries and Burial Sites Workgroup.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) the Director of the Maryland Historical Trust, or the Director’s
designee;
(2) the Executive Director of the Maryland Office of Cemetery Oversight,
or the Executive Director’s designee;
(3) the Chair of the Maryland Commission on African American History
and Culture, or the Chair’s designee;
(4) the President of the Coalition to Protect Maryland Burial Sites,
Incorporated, or the President’s designee;
(5) the Chief of the Office of Cultural Resources in the Maryland
Department of Transportation, or the Chief’s designee;
(6) the President of Preservation Maryland, or the President’s designee;
(7) the Maryland State Archivist, or the Maryland State Archivist’s
designee; and
(8) the following members, appointed by the Secretary of Labor:
(i) a representative of a local government with an existing cemetery
inventory program;
(ii) up to three representatives from local genealogical and historical
organizations that carry out cemetery research and documentation;
– 1 –

Ch. 411 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) a representative of a local descendant community;
(iv) a representative of a local cemetery; and
(v) a representative of a religious cemetery.
(c) The chair of the Workgroup shall be selected by the Workgroup from among
its members.
(d) The Maryland Historical Trust and the Office of Cemetery Oversight shall
provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) identify and review the various definitions of the terms “cemetery”,
“burial group”, “burial site”, and any related terms in the Maryland Annotated Code and
recommend a single definition for each term;
(2) identify and evaluate current cemetery documentation practices used
by county governments and municipal cultural resource management and historic
preservation programs, nonprofit preservation organizations, and private entities;
(3) identify and evaluate cemetery inventory systems implemented in
other states to determine best practices for and challenges to designing, implementing, and
maintaining a cemetery inventory system in the State;
(4) evaluate existing cemetery inventories maintained by county
governments, historic preservation programs, and genealogical organizations to determine
the best methods for integrating existing information into a State cemetery inventory
system;
(5) identify and recommend a set of categories for data collection and
maintenance and system functions, including a public search function, for a State cemetery
inventory system;
(6) recommend the appropriate entity to collect data for and maintain a
State cemetery inventory system;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 411
(7) determine the cost of designing, implementing, and maintaining a State
cemetery inventory system and recommend a source of funding to implement a State
cemetery inventory system beginning in fiscal year 2027; and
(8) evaluate the feasibility and cost of establishing a grant program to
provide financial assistance to governmental entities and nonprofit genealogical and
historical organizations to expedite identification of cemeteries and recommend the funding
amount and source for a grant program beginning in fiscal year 2027.
(g) On or before December 1, 2025, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –